Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse

431.650.
Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse.

The Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse is hereby created.

The commission shall be composed of the following members:

The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services or a designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities or a designee;

One (1) social service worker who is employed by the Department for Community Based Services to provide child protective services, who shall be appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

One (1) therapist who provides services to sexually abused children, who shall be appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police or a designee;

One (1) law enforcement officer who is a detective with specialized training in conducting child sexual abuse investigations, who shall be appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

One (1) employee of the Administrative Office of the Courts appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Kentucky;

Two (2) employees of the Attorney General’s Office who shall be appointed by the Attorney General;

One (1) Commonwealth’s attorney who shall be appointed by the Attorney General;

The commissioner of the Department of Education or a designee;

One (1) school counselor, school psychologist, or school social worker who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Education;

One (1) representative of a children’s advocacy center who shall be appointed by the Governor;

One (1) physician appointed by the Governor; and

One (1) former victim of a sexual offense or one (1) parent of a child sexual abuse victim who shall be appointed by the Attorney General.

Appointees shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority but shall not serve longer than four (4) years without reappointment.

The commission shall elect a chairperson annually from its membership.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 18, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 602, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 55, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 144, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 70, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 314, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 146, § 116, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 74, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). This statute was amended by 2012 Ky. Acts chs. 146 and 158, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/26/2007). A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to
KRS

7.136

.

431.660.
Duties and powers of commission.

The Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse shall:

Prepare and issue a model protocol for local multidisciplinary teams regarding investigation and prosecution of child sexual abuse and the role of children’s advocacy centers on multidisciplinary teams.

Review and approve protocols prepared by local multidisciplinary teams.

Advise local multidisciplinary teams on the investigation and prosecution of child sexual abuse.

Receive data on child sexual abuse cases collected by the Prosecutors Advisory Council and issue annual reports.

Collect data on the operation of local multidisciplinary teams.

Seek funding to support special projects relating to the operation of local multidisciplinary teams.

Receive and review complaints regarding local multidisciplinary teams, and make appropriate recommendations.

Recommend to the Governor, Legislative Research Commission, and Supreme Court changes in state programs, legislation, administrative regulations, policies, budgets, and treatment and service standards which may facilitate effective intervention of child sexual abuse cases and the investigation and prosecution of perpetrators of child sexual abuse, and which may improve the opportunity for victims of child sexual abuse to receive treatment.

The Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse may, within budget limitations, establish and maintain necessary offices, appoint employees, and prescribe the duties and compensation for the appointed employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 308, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 18, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 144, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

431.670.
Attachment of commission to Office of the Attorney General.

For administrative purposes only, the Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse shall be attached to the Office of the Attorney General.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 308, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.